Missouri, session 2026, HB3018.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 12.025, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 12.025, to read as follows:
12.025. [1.] Jurisdiction concurrent with that of the state of Missouri in and over land
which is now, or may hereafter be, owned and used by the United States as an honor farm in
connection with the operation of a federal penitentiary is hereby ceded to the United States for
so long as the United States shall own and so use the land.
[2. Jurisdiction concurrent with that of the state of Missouri is hereby ceded to the
United States within the area comprising the "Ozark National Scenic Riverways" for so long
as this area is administered and maintained by the United States.
3. Provided that no part of this section shall apply to the White River watershed.
4. Provided further that no part of this section shall apply to the Osage and St.
Francois River watersheds.]
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.